Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 5.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201069-2427
Act, how cited.

Sections 69-2427 to 69-2449 shall be known and
may be cited as the Concealed Handgun Permit Act.

Laws 2006, LB 454, § 1;

Laws 2009, LB430, § 9;

Laws 2010, LB817, § 5.